Massachusetts, session 194th, S263.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 140 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, 
is hereby further amended by inserting after Section 174H the following new section: 
174I. Selling of animal tested cosmetics.  
1. For the purposes of this section the following terms shall have the following meanings: 
(a) "Cosmetic", shall mean articles intended to be rubbed, brushed, poured, sprinkled, or 
sprayed on, introduced into, or otherwise applied to the human body or any part thereof for 
cleaning or for enhancing, concealing or  changing the appearance, including but not limited to 
personal products such as deodorant, shampoo and conditioner.  
(b) "Animal testing", shall mean the internal or  external application of a cosmetic, either 
in its final form or any ingredient thereof, to the skin, eyes, or other body part of a live non-
human vertebrate. 

of 4 12  (c) "Ingredient", shall have the same meaning as defined in 21 CFR 700.3(e). 
(d)  "Manufacturer", shall mean any person whose name appears on the label of a 
cosmetic pursuant to the requirements of 21 CFR 701.12. 
(e) "Supplier", shall mean any entity that supplies, directly or through a third  party, any  
ingredient used by a manufacturer in the formulation of a cosmetic.  
2.  Except as otherwise provided in this section, it shall be unlawful for a manufacturer to 
import for profit, sell or offer for sale in the commnwealth, any cosmetic which the manufacturer 
knew or reasonably should have known that animal testing was conducted or contracted by or on 
behalf of the  manufacturer or any supplier of the manufacturer if the animal testing was 
conducted after the effective date of this section. No provision of this subsection shall be 
construed to apply to a test method conducted for the purposes of medical research. 
3. This section does not apply to animal testing that is conducted:  
(a) As a requirement of any federal or state regulatory agency if: 
(i) the cosmetic or an ingredient in the cosmetic which is being tested is in wide use and 
cannot be replaced by another ingredient which is capable of performing a similar function; and 
(ii) a specific human health problem relating to the cosmetic or ingredient is substantiated 
and the need to conduct animal testing is justified and supported by a detailed protocol for 
research that is proposed as the basis for the evaluation of the cosmetic or ingredient; and 
(iii) there does not exist a method of testing other than animal testing that is accepted  for 
the relevant purpose by a federal or state regulatory agency. 

of 4 32  (b) As a requirement of any regulatory agency of a foreign jurisdiction, if no evidence 
derived  from such testing was relied upon to substantiate the safety of a cosmetic sold within the 
commonwealth by the manufacturer.  
(c) For any product or ingredient in a cosmetic which is subject to the requirements under 
21 USC subchapter V. 
(d) For purposes not related to cosmetics as required by any federal, state or foreign  
regulatory agency, provided that no evidence derived from such testing was relied upon  to  
substantiate the safety of a cosmetic sold within the state by the manufacturer, unless: 
(i) documentary evidence exists that the intent of the animal testing was unrelated to 
cosmetics; and  
(ii) there is a history of the use of  the ingredient unrelated to cosmetics for a minimum of 
twelve months. 
4. This section does not apply to a cosmetic: 
(a)  If, in its final form, such cosmetic was tested on animals before the effective date of 
this section, even if the cosmetic is manufactured on or after such date. 
(b) If an ingredient contained in such cosmetic was tested on animals and sold in the 
commonwealth before the effective date of this section, even if such ingredient is manufactured 
on or after such date. 
5. This section may not be construed to prevent a manufacturer from reviewing, assessing 
or retaining data resulting from exempted animal testing or from past animal testing results. 

of 4 52  6. The attorney general may, upon a determination that there is a reasonable likelihood of 
a violation of this section, review any testing data on which a manufacturer has relied in 
determining the safety of a cosmetic or an ingredient in a cosmetic sold in Massachusetts. Any 
information related to a trade secret, as defined in section 42 of chapter 93 or 18 U.S.C. § 
1839(3) and per Fair Packaging and Labeling Program, 15 U.S.C. § 1454(c)(3), disclosed under 
this section shall be protected and the attorney general shall enter into a protective order with the 
manufacturer before receipt of such information. 
The attorney general shall take other appropriate measures as necessary to preserve the 
confidentiality of the information produced pursuant to this section. The attorney general may 
bring an action or special proceeding in the supreme court for a judgment enjoining the 
continuance of such violation and for a civil penalty of not more than five thousand dollars for 
the first violation and not more than one thousand dollars per day if the violation continues. 
SECTION 2. This shall take effect 6 months after the passage of this act.